Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Part 4. Limitations on Agreements and Practices

§ 40-14-332.
Scope.

This part applies to consumer loans.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-401; W.S. 1957, § 40-3-401.

§ 40-14-333.
Balloon payments.

With respect to a consumer loan, other than one pursuant to a revolving loan account, if any scheduled payment is more than twice as large as the average of earlier scheduled payments, the debtor has the right to refinance the amount of that payment at the time it is due if the creditor is still offering that type of credit and the debtor is credit worthy. Credit terms shall be as favorable as those offered to the general public by the creditor for the same type of credit at the time a request for refinancing is approved. These provisions do not apply to the extent that the payment schedule is adjusted to the seasonal or irregular income of the debtor.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-402; W.S. 1957, § 40-3-402; Laws 1981, ch. 147, § 1; 1985, ch. 200, § 1.

§ 40-14-334.
No assignment of earnings.

A lender may not take an assignment of earnings of the debtor for payment or as security for payment of a debt arising out of a consumer loan. An assignment of earnings in violation of this section is unenforceable by the assignee of the earnings and revocable by the debtor. This section does not prohibit an employee from authorizing deductions from his earnings if the authorization is revocable.

Notwithstanding the prohibition of subsection (a) of this section, a lender may take an assignment of commissions or accounts receivable payable to the debtor for services rendered for payment or as security for payment of a debt arising out of a consumer loan.

A sale of unpaid earnings made in consideration of the payment of money to or for the account of the seller of the earnings is deemed to be a loan to him secured by an assignment of earnings.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-403; W.S. 1957, § 40-3-403.

§ 40-14-335.
Attorney's fees.

A consumer loan agreement may provide for the payment by the debtor of reasonable attorney’s fees after default and referral to an attorney not a salaried employee of the lender. A provision in violation of this section is unenforceable.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-404; W.S. 1957, § 40-3-404; 2021 ch. 14, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in the first sentence, substituted "A" for "Except as provided by the provisions on limitations on attorney's fees as to certain supervised loans (W.S.

40-14-353

), with respect to" and deleted "the" following "consumer loan."

§ 40-14-336.
Limitation on default charges.

Except for reasonable expenses incurred in realizing on a security interest, the agreement with respect to a consumer loan may not provide for charges as a result of default by the debtor other than those authorized by this act. A provision in violation of this section is unenforceable.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-405; W.S. 1957, § 40-3-405.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 40-14-140(a)(xxv).

§ 40-14-337.
Notice of assignment.

The debtor is authorized to pay the original lender until he receives notification of assignment of rights to payment pursuant to a consumer loan and that payment is to be made to the assignee. A notification which does not reasonably identify the rights assigned is ineffective. If requested by the debtor, the assignee must seasonably furnish reasonable proof that the assignment has been made and unless he does so the debtor may pay the original lender.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-406; W.S. 1957, § 40-3-406.

Quoted

in

Young v. Hawks, 624 P.2d 235,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 297

(Wyo. 1981).

§ 40-14-338.
Authorization to confess judgment prohibited.

A debtor may not authorize any person to confess judgment on a claim arising out of a consumer loan. An authorization in violation of this section is void.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-407; W.S. 1957, § 40-3-407.

§ 40-14-339.
Change in terms of revolving loan accounts.

If a lender makes a change in the terms of a revolving loan account without complying with this section any additional cost or charge to the debtor resulting from the change is an excess charge and subject to the remedies available to debtors (W.S.

40-14-521

) and to the administrator (W.S.

40-14-613

).

A lender may change the terms of a revolving loan account whether or not the change is authorized by prior agreement. Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the lender shall give to the debtor written notice of any change at least three (3) times, with the first notice at least six (6) months before the effective date of the change.

The notice specified in subsection (b) of this section is not required if notice of any proposed change in the terms of a revolving loan account is given to the customer at least thirty (30) days prior to the effective date of such change or thirty (30) days prior to the beginning of the billing cycle within which such change will become effective, whichever is the earlier date, and if:

The debtor after receiving notice of the change agrees in writing to the change;

The debtor elects to pay an amount designated on a billing statement as including a new charge for a benefit offered to the debtor when the benefit and charge constitute the change in terms and when the billing statement also states the amount payable if the new charge is excluded;

The change involves no significant cost to the debtor;

The debtor has previously consented in writing to the kind of change made and notice of the change is given to the debtor in two (2) billing cycles prior to the effective date of the change; or

The change applies only to debts incurred after a date specified in a notice of the change given in two (2) billing cycles prior to the effective date of the change.

The notice provided for in this section is given to the debtor when mailed to him at the address used by the lender for sending periodic billing statements.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-408; W.S. 1957, § 40-3-408.

§ 40-14-340.
Use of multiple agreements.

No lender shall permit any person or two (2) married persons to become obligated in any way under more than one (1) loan agreement with the lender or with a person related to the lender with intent to obtain a higher rate of loan finance charge than would otherwise be permitted or to avoid disclosure of an annual percentage rate pursuant to the laws relating to disclosure and advertising. The excess amount of loan finance charge provided for in agreements in violation of this section is an excess charge for the purposes of the provisions on the effect of violations on rights of parties (W.S.

40-14-521

) and the provisions on civil actions by administrator (W.S.

40-14-613

).

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 3-409; W.S. 1957, § 40-3-409; 2021 ch. 14, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, rewrote the first sentence, which read, "A lender may not use multiple agreements with intent to avoid disclosure of an annual percentage rate pursuant to the laws relating to disclosure and advertising."